Hawaii statutes.
§143-3 License fee controlled by ordinance.
Except where licenses are dispensed with pursuant to section 143-2, each county
council shall have the power to fix the license fee for dogs on a biennial
basis. Until and unless otherwise provided by ordinance the biennial license
fee for each dog shall be $4. Any person owning or having the custody or
control of any dog shall pay the license fee to the director of finance of the
county in which the dog is owned, kept, or controlled. The license fee shall be
due and payable on January 2 of every second year and shall be paid before
March 11 of every second year, or within thirty days after the exemption
ceases in the case of dogs becoming subject to this chapter.

The full amount of the fee shall be paid for
any fraction of the license period for which a license is issued.

All moneys received by the director of finance
under this chapter shall be paid into the general fund of such county. [L 1941,
c 268, §3; RL 1945, §7153; RL 1955, §156-3; am L 1959, c 120, §1; HRS §143-3;
am L 1973, c 146, §2; am L 1980, c 148, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next